District of Columbia statutes.
28-2102

Extent of assignment — Assets exempt.

An assignment vests in the assignee the title to all property, except what is legally exempt, belonging to the debtor at the time of making the assignment and comprehended within its general terms. The inventory annexed to an assignment is not conclusive as to the amount of the debtor’s estate.

An assignment for the benefit of creditors does not include or cover property exempt from levy or sale on execution unless the exemption is expressly waived. The court may direct the manner in which exempt property may be ascertained and set aside before a sale by a trustee.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 667, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
1981 Ed., § 28-2102.
1973 Ed., § 28-2102.